Massachusetts, session 194th, S2465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 78 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 23, after the word “service” the following words:- or if
called to active service as a current member of the Massachusetts National Guard or an Armed
Forces Reserve Component of a Massachusetts based unit.
of 1